Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-8234
Trauma team, defined.

Trauma team means a team of physicians, nurses, medical technicians, and other personnel compiled to respond to an acutely injured patient upon the patient's arrival at the hospital.

Laws 1997, LB 626, § 34;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 97;

Laws 2023, LB227, § 105.